Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-1-152. Prescription, dispensation, and administration of opioid antagonists — Immunity of certain individuals — Training of first responders.

As used in this section:

“Drug-related overdose” means an acute condition, including mania, hysteria, extreme physical illness, coma, or death resulting from the consumption or use of a controlled substance, or another substance with which a controlled substance was combined, and that a layperson would reasonably believe to be an opioid related drug overdose that requires medical assistance;

“Opioid antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride which is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of a drug overdose.

A licensed healthcare practitioner otherwise authorized to prescribe an opioid antagonist acting in good faith and exercising reasonable care may, directly or by standing order, prescribe an opioid antagonist to the following persons:

A person at risk of experiencing an opiate related overdose; or

A family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opiate-related overdose.

In order to establish good faith under subsection (b), a licensed healthcare practitioner, prior to prescribing an opioid antagonist, may require receipt of a written communication that provides a factual basis for a reasonable conclusion that:

The person seeking the opioid antagonist is at risk of experiencing an opiate-related overdose; or

The person seeking the opioid antagonist other than the person who is at risk of experiencing an opiate-related overdose, and who is seeking the opioid antagonist, is a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist the person at risk of experiencing an opiate-related overdose.

A person who receives an opioid antagonist that was prescribed pursuant to subsection (b) may administer an opioid antagonist to another person if:

The person has a good faith belief that the other person is experiencing an opioid related drug overdose; and

The person exercises reasonable care in administering the drug to the other person.

Evidence of the use of reasonable care in administering the drug shall include the receipt of basic instruction and information on how to administer the opioid antagonist, including successful completion of the online overdose prevention education program offered by the department of health.

The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee, in consultation with other state, federal or local government personnel, including contractors, shall create and maintain an online education program with the goal of educating laypersons and the general public on the administration of opioid antagonists and appropriate techniques and follow-up procedures for dealing with opioid related drug overdose.

The following individuals are immune from civil liability in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct for actions authorized by this section:

Any licensed healthcare practitioner who prescribes or dispenses an opioid antagonist pursuant to subsection (b); and

Any person who administers an opioid antagonist pursuant to subsection (d).

A licensed healthcare practitioner acting in good faith and with reasonable care, who prescribes, dispenses, or administers an opioid antagonist to a person the healthcare provider believes to be experiencing or is at risk of experiencing a drug-related overdose or prescribes an opioid antagonist to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person experiencing or at risk of experiencing a drug-related overdose is immune from disciplinary or adverse administrative actions under this title for acts or omissions during the administration, prescription, or dispensation of an opioid antagonist.

The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee shall make available recommendations for training of first responders, as defined in § 29-34-203, in the appropriate use of opioid antagonists. The recommendations shall include a provision concerning the appropriate supply of opioid antagonists to first responders to administer consistent with the requirements of this section.

Any person treated for a drug-related overdose with an opioid antagonist by a first responder shall be taken to a medical facility by emergency medical services for evaluation, unless the person is competent to refuse medical treatment and chooses to refuse treatment.

Acts 2014, ch. 623, § 1; 2015, ch. 396, § 5; 2017, ch. 484, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 484, § 1 and § 2 enacted two new subdivisions. However, since the subdivision added by § 1 contained the same language as the subdivision added by § 2, only the subdivision added by § 2 was retained since it had additional language not in conflict with the subdivsion added by § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 909, § 2 purported to enact § 63-1-152. Section 63-1-152 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 623, § 1, therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 909, § 2 was designated as § 63-1-153 by the authority of the code commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 396, § 1 provided that the act, which added (i), shall be known and may be cited as the “Addiction Treatment Act of 2015”.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (j).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 484, § 3. July 1, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-153. Signage of medical spas to display name and certification status of supervising medical director or physician.

As used in this section:

“Cosmetic medical service” means any service that uses a biologic or synthetic material, a chemical application, a mechanical device, or a displaced energy form of any kind that alters or damages, or is capable of altering or damaging, living tissue to improve the patient's appearance or achieve an enhanced aesthetic result;

“Media” or “advertising” means oral, written and other types of communication disseminated for the purpose of soliciting medical services. These communications include, but are not limited to, newspaper or magazine advertisement, telephone directory displays, printed brochures or leaflets, websites, email correspondence, and television or radio announcements;

“Medical director” or “supervising physician” means a physician who:

Holds an active medical license under chapter 6 or 9 of this title in this state;

Has an active medical practice in this state; and

Is responsible for the provision of or supervises the provision of cosmetic medical services; and

“Medical spa” means any entity, however named or organized, which offers or performs cosmetic medical services; provided, that a medical spa shall not include an individual physician's office or practice owned by a physician.

Any entity doing business as or advertised as a medical spa shall display the name of the medical director or supervising physician and shall indicate one of the following by signage at its practice site and in its media and advertising:

Whether the medical director or supervising physician is certified or eligible for certification by a private or public board, parent association, multidisciplinary board or association that is a member of the American Board of Medical Specialties (ABMS) or the American Osteopathic Association (AOA);

Whether the medical director or supervising physician is certified by a board or association with equivalent requirements to the ABMS or AOA as approved and recognized by the board of medical examiners or the board of osteopathic examination, as appropriate; or

Whether the medical director or supervising physician is certified by a board or association requiring an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME) or AOA approved training program that provides complete training in the specialty or subspecialty certified, followed by prerequisite certification by a certifying board of the ABMS or AOA in that training field and successful completion of an additional examination in the specialty or subspecialty certified.

If the medical director or supervising physician is not certified by any of the entities identified in subsection (b), then the lack of certification shall be displayed by signage at its practice site and in its media and advertising.

Acts 2014, ch. 909, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 909, § 2 purported to enact § 63-1-152. Section 63-1-152 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 623, § 1, therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 909, § 2 was designated as § 63-1-153 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 909, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be referred to as the “Tennessee Patient Safety Cosmetic Medical Procedures Act.”

Attorney General Opinions. An aesthetician licensed by the Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners may not perform microblading and/or microneedling in a cosmetology shop or at a medical spa. A person not licensed by the Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners may perform microneedling only if that person satisfies an exemption found in T.C.A. § 62-4-109. A person not licensed by the Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners may perform microblading only if that person satisfies an exemption found in T.C.A. § 62-4-109 and either is a licensed tattoo artist under T.C.A. § 62-38-204 or is exempt from tattooing laws and regulations under T.C.A. § 62-38-210(b). The marks created by microblading constitute a tattoo. An individual may perform microblading only if that person satisfies an exemption found in T.C.A. § 62-4-109 and is a licensed tattoo artist under T.C.A. § 62-38-204 or is exempt from tattooing laws and regulations under T.C.A. § 62-38-210(b). OAG 17-31, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (4/20/2017).

63-1-154. Health care prescriber prohibited from dispensing an opioid or benzodiazepine — Exceptions — Disposition of undispensed inventory.

Except as provided in § 63-1-313, a health care prescriber licensed under this title may not dispense an opioid or benzodiazepine. This section shall not apply to:

The dispensing of complimentary packages of medicinal drugs that are labeled as a drug sample or complimentary drug to the practitioner's own patients in the regular course of practice without the payment of a fee or remuneration of any kind;

The dispensing of opioids or benzodiazepines in the health care system of the department of correction;

The dispensing of opioids or benzodiazepines in connection with the performance of a surgical procedure performed at a licensed health care facility. The amount dispensed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(3) may not exceed a seven-day supply. This exception does not allow for the dispensing of an opioid or benzodiazepine more than seven (7) days after the performance of the surgical procedure;

The dispensing of opioids or benzodiazepines pursuant to an approved clinical trial. For purposes of this subsection (a), the term “approved clinical trial” means a clinical research study or clinical investigation that, in whole or in part, is state or federally funded or is conducted under an investigational new drug application that is reviewed by the United States food and drug administration;

The dispensing of an opioid drug in a nonresidential substitution-based treatment center for opiate addiction, as defined in § 68-11-1602;

The dispensing of an opioid or benzodiazepine to a patient of a facility that is licensed by the board for licensing health care facilities pursuant to § 68-11-202;

The dispensing of an opioid or benzodiazepine to a patient of a facility licensed under title 33;

The dispensing of an opioid or benzodiazepine by a physician practice that provides healthcare services that:

Dispenses opioids and benzodiazepines, as directed by the patient's prescription, in safety-sealed, prepackaged containers stamped with the manufacturer's national drug code (NDC) number;

Administers and records pill-counts for opioids or benzodiazepines in order to ensure patient compliance with the prescription;

Dispenses noncontrolled substances which amount to at least fifty percent (50%) of the prescriptions filled annually from the practice; and

Submits controlled substance dispensing information to the controlled substances monitoring database under title 53, chapter 10, part 3, according to the requirements of state law; or

The dispensing of an opioid or benzodiazepine by a veterinarian in the course of the veterinarian's practice.

Within ten (10) days after January 1, 2015, each medical practitioner licensed under this title, unless the practitioner meets one (1) of the exceptions listed in subsection (a), shall ensure that the undispensed inventory of opioids and benzodiazepines purchased under the prescriber's drug enforcement administration number for dispensing is:

Returned in compliance with this section to a licensed third party reverse distributor; or

Turned in to local law enforcement agencies and abandoned.

Wholesalers shall buy back the undispensed inventory of opioids and benzodiazepines, which are in the manufacturer's original packing, unopened, and in date, in accordance with the established policies of the wholesaler or the contractual terms between the wholesaler and the practitioner concerning returns.

Acts 2014, ch. 983, § 3; 2016, ch. 973, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 983, § 5 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Law Reviews.

The Right Hammer for the Right Nail: Public Health Tools in the Struggle Between Pain and Addiction, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1300 (Summer 2018).

63-1-155. Telehealth services — Establishment of provider-patient relationship — Standard of practice — Applicability.

For the purposes of this section:

“Healthcare provider” means:

An individual acting within the scope of a valid license issued pursuant to this title;

Any state-contracted crisis service provider that is employed by a facility licensed under title 33; or

Any alcohol and drug abuse counselor licensed under title 68, chapter 24, part 6; and

Notwithstanding any restriction imposed by §§ 56-7-1002 and 56-7-1003, “telehealth,” “telemedicine,” and “provider-based telemedicine” mean the use of real time audio, video, or other electronic media and telecommunication technology that enables interaction between a healthcare provider and a patient, or also store-and-forward telemedicine services as defined in § 56-7-1002, for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment of a patient at a distant site where there may be no in-person exchange between a healthcare provider and a patient.

For the purposes of this section, a healthcare provider-patient relationship with respect to telemedicine or telehealth is created by mutual consent and mutual communication, except in an emergency, between the patient and the provider. The consent by the patient may be expressed or implied consent; however, the provider-patient relationship is not created simply by the receipt of patient health information by a provider unless a prior provider-patient relationship exists. The duties and obligations created by the relationship do not arise until the healthcare provider:

Affirmatively undertakes to diagnose or treat the patient; or

Affirmatively participates in the diagnosis or treatment.

A healthcare provider who delivers services through the use of telehealth is held to the same standard of professional practice as a similar licensee of the same practice area or specialty that is providing the same healthcare services through in-person encounters, and nothing in this section is intended to create any new standards of care.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1)(A), telehealth services must be provided in compliance with the guidelines created pursuant to part 4 of this chapter.

The board or licensing entity governing any healthcare provider covered by this section shall not establish a more restrictive standard of professional practice for the practice of telehealth than that specifically authorized by the provider's practice act or other specifically applicable statute, including this chapter or title 53, chapter 10 or 11.

This section does not apply to pain management clinics, as defined in § 63-1-301, chronic nonmalignant pain treatment, or those individuals licensed pursuant to chapter 12 of this title.

Sections 63-6-231 and 63-6-214(b)(21) do not apply to the practice of telemedicine under this section.

This section does not apply to or restrict the requirements of § 63-6-241.

Section 63-6-204(a) also applies to telemedicine.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2), to practice under this section a healthcare provider must be licensed to practice in this state under this title.

A physician must be licensed to practice under chapter 6 or 9 of this title in order to practice telemedicine pursuant to § 63-6-209(b), except as otherwise authorized by law or rule.

[Subsection (h) repealed effective April 1, 2022.]

Notwithstanding subsection (a), for the purposes of this section “healthcare provider” means:

Any provider licensed under this title;

Any state-contracted crisis service provider that is employed by a facility licensed under title 33; or

Any alcohol and drug abuse counselor licensed under title 68, chapter 24, part 6.

This subsection (h) is repealed on April 1, 2022.

Acts 2015, ch. 261, § 1; 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 10 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to insurance policies or contracts issued, entered into, renewed, or amended on or after August 20, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by ch. 4, rewrote (a), which read: “(a) For the purposes of this section:“(1) ‘Healthcare provider’ means:“(A) Any provider licensed under this title who is authorized to diagnose and treat humans; or“(B) Any state-contracted crisis service provider employed by a facility licensed under title 33; and“(2) ‘Telehealth’ or ‘telemedicine’ means, notwithstanding any restriction imposed by § 56-7-1002, the use of real-time audio, video, or other electronic media and telecommunications technologies that enable interaction between the healthcare provider and the patient, or also store-and-forward telemedicine services, as defined by § 56-7-1002(a), for the purpose of diagnosis, consultation, or treatment of a patient in another location where there may be no in-person exchange.”; substituted “or” for “and” following “diagnose” or “diagnosis” in (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “is held” for “shall be held” in (c)(1)(A); substituted “must” for “shall” in (c)(1)(B); in (c)(3), substituted “does” for “shall”, deleted “and” following “§ 63-1-301,”, and added “, or those individuals licensed pursuant to chapter 12 of this title”; substituted “subdivision 63-6-214(b)(21) do” for “63-6-214(b)(21) shall” in (d); substituted “does” for “shall” in (e); substituted “63-6-204(a) also applies” for “63-6-204(a) shall also apply” in (f); substituted “must” for “shall” in (g)(1) and (g)(2); and added (h).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 10. August 20, 2020.

63-1-156. Immunity from prosecution when seeking medical assistance for drug overdose — Providing first aid or other medical assistance as mitigating factor — Effect on admissibility of evidence.

As used in this section:

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor identified, defined, or listed in title 39, chapter 17, part 4 and title 53, chapter 11;

“Drug overdose” means an acute condition, including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, mania, or death, resulting from the consumption or use of a controlled substance, or other substance inhaled, ingested, injected, or otherwise introduced into the body by the distressed individual that a reasonable person would believe to be resulting from the consumption or use of a controlled substance or other substance by the distressed individual;

“Drug violation” means:

A violation of § 39-17-418; or

A violation of § 39-17-425;

“Medical assistance” means aid provided to a person by a healthcare professional licensed, registered, or certified under the laws of this state who, acting within the person's lawful scope of practice, may provide diagnosis, treatment, or emergency medical services; and

“Seeks medical assistance” means:

Accesses or assists in accessing medical assistance or the 911 system;

Contacts or assists in contacting law enforcement or a poison control center; or

Provides care or contacts or assists in contacting any person or entity to provide care while awaiting the arrival of medical assistance to aid a person who is experiencing or believed to be experiencing a drug overdose.

Any person who in good faith seeks medical assistance for a person experiencing or believed to be experiencing a drug overdose shall not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted for a drug violation if the evidence for the arrest, charge, or prosecution of the drug violation resulted from seeking such medical assistance. Any person who is experiencing a drug overdose and who in good faith seeks medical assistance for or is the subject of a request for medical assistance shall not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted for a drug violation if the evidence for the arrest, charge, or prosecution of the drug violation resulted from seeking such medical assistance. This immunity from being arrested, charged, or prosecuted shall apply to the person experiencing a drug overdose only on the person's first such drug overdose. Any such person shall also not be subject to the following, if related to the seeking of medical assistance:

Penalties for a violation of a permanent or temporary protective order or restraining order; or

Sanctions for a violation of a condition of pretrial release, condition of probation, or condition of parole based on a drug violation.

The act of providing first aid or other medical assistance to someone who is experiencing a drug overdose may be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal prosecution for which immunity, set out in subsection (b), is not provided.

Nothing in this section shall limit the admissibility of any evidence in connection with the investigation or prosecution of a crime with regard to a defendant who does not qualify for the protections of subsection (b) or with regard to other crimes committed by a person who otherwise qualifies for the protections of subsection (b).

Nothing in this section shall limit any seizure of evidence or contraband otherwise permitted by law.

Nothing in this section shall limit or abridge the authority of a law enforcement officer to detain or take into custody a person in the course of an investigation or to effectuate an arrest for any offense except as provided in subsection (b).

Acts 2015, ch. 396, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 396, § 1 provided that the act which enacted this section shall be known and may be cited as the “Addiction Treatment Act of 2015”.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-157. Statewide collaborative pharmacy practice.

As used in this section:

“Chief medical officer” means the chief medical officer for the department of health;

“Opioid antagonist” means a drug that binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting and equally safe drug approved by the United States food and drug administration for the treatment of drug overdose;

“Opioid antagonist training program” means a training program approved by the department of health related to opioid antagonist therapy. The training program shall include, but not be limited to, proper administration techniques, use, documentation, and quality assurance.

The chief medical officer is authorized to implement a statewide collaborative pharmacy practice agreement specific to opioid antagonist therapy with any pharmacist licensed in, and practicing in, this state.

A pharmacist licensed in, and practicing in, this state is authorized to dispense an opioid antagonist, in good faith, pursuant to a valid statewide collaborative pharmacy practice agreement executed by the chief medical officer.

Under a valid statewide collaborative pharmacy practice agreement authorized by the chief medical officer, an authorized pharmacist may dispense an opioid antagonist to:

A person at risk of experiencing an opiate-related overdose;

A family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opiate-related overdose.

Before a pharmacist enters into a statewide collaborative pharmacy practice agreement with the chief medical officer for the dispensing of an opioid antagonist, the pharmacist shall be able to provide documentation of completion of an opioid antagonist training program within the previous two (2) years.

The pharmacist shall maintain the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement in accordance with the requirements set forth in § 63-10-217, and this agreement must be made available to the department of health upon request.

Any licensed pharmacist acting in good faith and with reasonable care, who dispenses an opioid antagonist to a person the pharmacist believes to be experiencing or at risk of experiencing a drug-related overdose, or who dispenses an opioid antagonist to a family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a person experiencing or at risk of experiencing a drug-related overdose, is immune from disciplinary or adverse administrative actions under this title for acts or omissions during the dispensation of an opioid antagonist.

Any licensed pharmacist who dispenses an opioid antagonist pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) is immune from civil liability in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct for actions authorized by this section.

The chief medical officer shall be immune from disciplinary or adverse administrative actions under this title, as well as civil liability in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, for acts or omissions during the dispensing of an opioid antagonist by a pharmacist acting pursuant to a collaborative agreement established pursuant to this section.

Acts 2016, ch. 596, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act relative to collaborative pharmacy practice agreements for opioid antagonist therapy, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 596.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-158. Epinephrine-administration protocol — Definitions — Possession of epinephrine kits by law enforcement officers — Liability — Record requirement.

As used in this section:

“Epinephrine kit” means a dose of epinephrine and a device for administering the dose of epinephrine;

“Law enforcement agency” has the same meaning as in § 39-13-519;

“Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in § 39-11-106; and

“Pharmacist” has the same meaning as in § 63-10-204.

A law enforcement agency may develop an epinephrine-administration protocol in accordance with this section. The epinephrine-administration protocol shall be developed by a physician licensed under chapter 6 or 9 of this title.

For any law enforcement agency that has developed a epinephrine-administration protocol in accordance with subsection (b), a health care prescriber may prescribe epinephrine kits in the name of the law enforcement agency and a pharmacist may dispense epinephrine kits to the law enforcement agency pursuant to a prescription issued in the name of the law enforcement agency.

In coordination with the appropriate local emergency medical services providers and in accordance with this section, a law enforcement officer may possess an epinephrine kit prescribed to the law enforcement officer's law enforcement agency for the purpose of administering epinephrine in an emergency situation to treat anaphylactic reactions if authorized to do so by the officer's law enforcement agency.

A law enforcement officer may administer epinephrine to treat an anaphylactic reaction if the law enforcement officer is authorized to administer epinephrine by the officer's law enforcement agency, has completed the training required by subsection (f) within the past twelve (12) months, and administers the epinephrine in accordance with a protocol adopted by the officer's law enforcement agency in accordance with subsection (b).

A law enforcement agency shall require that each officer that is authorized to administer epinephrine receive training from qualified medical personnel at least annually. The training shall include:

Patient assessment, including signs and symptoms of anaphylactic shock;

Universal precautions;

Rescue breathing;

Seeking medical attention; and

The use of intramuscular epinephrine as detailed in the protocol described in subsection (b).

A law enforcement agency shall keep a record of each officer's participation in training pursuant to this subsection (f).

A physician shall not be held liable for any injury to an individual who is harmed by the administration of the epinephrine prescribed by the physician pursuant to this section unless the physician acted with reckless disregard for safety.

A law enforcement officer shall not be held liable for any injury to an individual who is harmed by the administration of epinephrine by the law enforcement officer pursuant to this section unless the law enforcement officer acted with reckless disregard for safety.

A law enforcement agency shall not be held liable for any injury to an individual who is harmed by the administration of epinephrine by a law enforcement officer employed by the law enforcement agency pursuant to this section unless the law enforcement agency acted with reckless disregard for safety.

A pharmacist shall not be held liable for any injury to an individual who is harmed by the administration of the epinephrine dispensed by the pharmacist and prescribed by a physician pursuant to this section unless the pharmacist acted with reckless disregard for safety.

A law enforcement officer that administers epinephrine in accordance with this section shall file a record of the event with the appropriate local emergency medical services agency. The record shall include the signs, symptoms, therapies, response, and disposition of the event.

Acts 2016, ch. 801, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning administration of epinephrine in emergency circumstances, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 801.

63-1-159. Prohibited offer or payment, or offer or solicitation, of commission for referral of patient or patronage with respect to alcohol or drug services.

A healthcare provider licensed under this title, with respect to alcohol and drug services, as defined in § 33-2-402, shall not knowingly:

Offer or pay a commission, benefit, rebate, kickback, or bribe, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, or engage in any split-fee arrangement, in any form whatsoever, to induce the referral of a patient or patronage to or from a licensee or facility licensed under title 33, chapter 2, part 4;

Solicit or receive a commission, benefit, rebate, kickback, or bribe, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, or engage in any split-fee arrangement, in any form whatsoever, in return for referring a patient or patronage to or from a licensee or facility licensed under title 33, chapter 2, part 4;

Solicit or receive a commission, benefit, rebate, kickback, or bribe, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, or engage in any split-fee arrangement, in any form whatsoever, in return for the acceptance or acknowledgment of treatment from a licensee or facility licensed under title 33, chapter 2, part 4; or

Aid, abet, advise, or otherwise participate in the conduct prohibited under subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3).

Any healthcare provider licensed under this title, with respect to alcohol and drug services, that violates this section is subject to suspension or revocation of the healthcare provider's license by the appropriate healthcare licensing board and the imposition of civil penalties as authorized under this title.

Acts 2018, ch. 855, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 855, § 4. July 1, 2018.

63-1-160. Prescription for Schedule ll controlled substance — Electronic prescription for Schedule ll, lll, lV, or V controlled substance
— Exceptions.

As used in this section, “electronic prescription” means a written prescription that is generated on an electronic application and is transmitted in accordance with 21 CFR Part 1311.

All written, printed, or electronic prescription orders for a Schedule II controlled substance must contain all information otherwise required by law. The healthcare prescriber must sign the written, printed, or electronic prescription order on the day it is issued. Nothing in this section prevents a healthcare prescriber from issuing a verbal prescription order.

Subject to subsection (d), on or after January 1, 2021, any prescription for a Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance issued by a prescriber who is authorized by law to prescribe the drug must be issued as an electronic prescription from the person issuing the prescription to a pharmacy. The name, address, and telephone number of the collaborating physician of an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant must be included on electronic prescriptions issued by an advance practice registered nurse or physician assistant.

Subsection (c) does not apply to prescriptions:

Issued by veterinarians;

Issued in circumstances where electronic prescribing is not available due to technological or electrical failure, as set forth in rule;

Issued by a health care prescriber to be dispensed by a pharmacy located outside the state, as set forth in rule;

Issued when the health care prescriber and dispenser are the same entity;

Issued while including elements that are not supported by the most recently implemented version of the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs Prescriber/Pharmacist Interface SCRIPT Standard;

Issued by a health care prescriber for a drug that the federal food and drug administration (FDA) requires the prescription to contain certain elements that are not able to be accomplished with electronic prescribing;

Issued by a health care prescriber allowing for the dispensing of a non-patient-specific prescription pursuant to a standing order, approved protocol for drug therapy, collaborative pharmacy practice agreement in response to a public health emergency, or in other circumstances where the health care prescriber may issue a non-patient-specific prescription;

Issued by a health care prescriber prescribing a drug under a research protocol;

Issued by a health care prescriber who has received a waiver or a renewed waiver for a specified period determined by the commissioner of health, not to exceed one (1) year without renewal by the commissioner, from the requirement to use electronic prescribing, pursuant to a process established in rule by the commissioner, due to economic hardship, technological limitations that are not reasonably within the control of the health care prescriber, or other exceptional circumstance demonstrated by the health care prescriber;

Issued by a health care prescriber under circumstances where, notwithstanding the health care prescriber's present ability to make an electronic prescription as required by this subsection (a), the health care prescriber reasonably determines that it would be impractical for the patient to obtain substances prescribed by electronic prescription in a timely manner, and such delay would adversely impact the patient's medical condition;

Issued by a health care prescriber who issues fifty (50) or fewer prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances per year.

A pharmacist who receives a written, oral, or faxed prescription is not required to verify with the health care prescriber that the prescription properly falls under one (1) of the exceptions from the requirement to electronically prescribe in subsection (d). Pharmacists may continue to dispense medications from otherwise valid written, oral, or fax prescriptions that are consistent with § 53-11-308.

The commissioner of health shall refer individual health care prescribers who violate this section to the health care prescriber's licensing board, and for such violation in this section, the health care prescriber is subject to penalties under § 63-1-134.

Any health-related board under § 68-1-101(a)(8) that is affected by this section, shall report to the general assembly by January 1, 2019, on issues related to the implementation of this section.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 1; 2019, ch. 124, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b) and (c) which read: “(b) Subject to subsection (c), any written, printed, or electronic prescription order for a Schedule II controlled substance prepared by a health care prescriber who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legibly printed, entered, or typed as a separate prescription order. The written, printed, or electronic prescription order must contain all information otherwise required by law. The health care prescriber must sign the written, printed, or electronic prescription order on the day it is issued. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a health care prescriber from issuing a verbal prescription order.“(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, on or after January 1, 2020, any prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance shall be issued as an electronic prescription from the person issuing the prescription to a pharmacy. The name, address, and telephone number of the collaborating physician of an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant shall be included on the electronic prescription.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 12. January 1, 2019; provided that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect May 3, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 124, § 16. April 9, 2019.